Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-626
Referendum; state agency; forms; make available; aid political subdivisions.

The state agency shall prepare and make available for the use of the state, its political subdivisions, and instrumentalities of the state and any other state or states, forms of notices, ballots, and any other forms necessary for the conduct of the referendum provided for in sections 68-621 to 68-630, and shall aid in the completion and preparation of such instruments by the officers of referendum groups and shall provide advice and assistance to officers of the state, political subdivisions thereof, and instrumentalities of the state and other states jointly, relative to the preparation for and conduct of such referendums, and relative to the preparation and submission of plans for the extension of benefits under Title II of the Social Security Act to the employees thereof.

Laws 1955, c. 264, § 20, p. 825.